Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.230

Use of another's license or diploma a felony.

Any person filing or attempting to file, as his or her own, the diploma or license of another is guilty of forgery under RCW 9A.60.020.

[ 2003 c 53 s 139; 1941 c 71 s 23; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-23.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Forgery: RCW 9A.60.020.